Utah statutes.
31A-23a-403.   Inherent unsuitability.
(1)  If the commissioner finds after a hearing that a certain type of accident
and health insurance, life insurance, or annuity product is inherently
unsuitable for persons of certain ages or in certain conditions of health, the
commissioner shall make a rule declaring the accident and health insurance,
life insurance, or annuity product as inherently unsuitable for persons of
certain ages or in certain conditions of health.
(2)  An accident and health insurance, life insurance, or annuity product that
is subject to the rule may not be sold to a person for whom the product has
been determined as inherently unsuitable unless that person purchasing the
product signs a receipt acknowledging having received a statement that
expresses that the product has been determined by the commissioner to be
inherently unsuitable for persons of certain ages or in certain conditions of
health.
(3)  Unless the insurer or its appointed licensee establishes that its sale of
coverage is inconsistent with the rule made under Subsection (1) is due to
excusable neglect, the purchaser may treat the sale as voidable, if acted upon
by the insured within a two-year period from the date of sale.
